Missouri, session 2026, HB2972.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 210.070 and 210.100, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 210.070 and 210.100, to read as follows:
210.070. 1. Immediately after delivery of a newborn infant, a physician, midwife,
or nurse who shall be in attendance upon [a] the newborn infant or its mother [shall] may
drop into the eyes of such infant [a prophylactic medication approved by the state department
of health and senior services] erythromycin to protect the infant from any infection that
may have been contracted during the birthing process. The physician, midwife, or
nurse in attendance at the birth shall not administer erythromycin eye drops unless
informed consent from the infant's parent or legal guardian has been obtained and
documented. Within forty-eight hours of the administration of erythromycin eye drops,
a written report on the administration of the eye drops as well as written documentation
of the informed consent obtained from the infant's parent or legal guardian shall be
provided to the local public health agency of the city, town, or county where the birth
occurred.
2. [Administration of such eye drops shall not be required if a parent or legal guardian
of such infant objects to the treatment because it is against the religious beliefs of the parent
or legal guardian.] A parent or legal guardian may report any administration of
erythromycin eye drops without the informed consent required under this section to the
department of health and senior services. Any physician, midwife, or nurse who
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2972 2
administers erythromycin eye drops without the informed consent required under this
section shall receive a written warning from the department of health and senior
services for the first violation. A second violation shall result in a fine of five thousand
dollars and a one-year suspension of any professional health-related license held by the
physician, midwife, or nurse by the relevant licensing board. A third and any
subsequent violation shall result in a fine of five thousand dollars and revocation of any
such professional license by the relevant licensing board.
3. Failure or refusal of the parent or legal guardian of a newborn infant to
consent to the administration of erythromycin eye drops under this section shall not be
grounds to contact any state agency or department including, but not limited to, the
children's division of the department of social services. If any state agency or
department is contacted in violation of this subsection, the parent or legal guardian of
the newborn infant may bring a civil action in circuit court for such relief as may be
appropriate. Any such action may be brought in the county where the violation
occurred. The court shall award court costs and reasonable attorney's fees incurred by
the parent or legal guardian if the court finds that this subsection has been violated.
210.100. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person violating any
of the provisions of sections 210.070 to 210.090 shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor.
2. Administration of erythromycin eye drops by a physician, midwife, or nurse
in violation of the requirements of section 210.070 shall not be a criminal act but shall
subject the physician, midwife, or nurse to the penalties described in subsection 2 of
section 210.070.
✔